Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0855.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
PART 1
LINE-ITEM APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the department of
environment, Great Lakes, and energy for the fiscal year ending
September 30, 2027, from the following funds:
DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENT, GREAT LAKES, AND
ENERGY
APPROPRIATION SUMMARY
RMH S06106'26 (S-1) n52eu9


Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0
Full-time equated classified positions 1,631.0
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 945,017,200
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
Total interdepartmental grants and
intradepartmental transfers 4,237,600
ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 940,779,600
Federal revenues:
Total federal revenues 464,743,400
Special revenue funds:
Total local revenues 0
Total private revenues 1,892,500
Total other state restricted revenues 362,305,500
State general fund/general purpose $ 111,838,200
Sec. 102. DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND
SUPPORT
Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0
Full-time equated classified positions 106.0
Unclassified salaries--FTE positions 6.0 $ 1,022,500
Accounting service center 1,596,800
Administrative hearings officers 906,600
Environmental investigations--FTEs 12.0 2,507,700
Environmental support--FTEs 56.0 10,072,500
Executive direction--FTEs 20.0 4,506,400
Facilities management 1,200,000
Financial support--FTEs 18.0 12,928,600
Michigan geological survey 400,000
RMH S06106'26 (S-1) n52eu9


Property management 11,658,700
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 46,799,800
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
IDG from Michigan department of state police 91,300
IDG from state transportation department 139,300
Federal revenues:
Federal funds 766,600
Special revenue funds:
Private funds 1,200,000
Air emissions fees 1,072,300
Aquatic nuisance control fund 71,900
Campground fund 27,100
Cleanup and redevelopment fund 4,681,000
Coal ash care fund 19,200
Electronic waste recycling fund 24,200
Environmental education fund 239,900
Environmental pollution prevention fund 384,900
Fees and collections 18,000
Financial instruments 11,517,700
Great Lakes protection fund 550,500
Groundwater discharge permit fees 153,000
Infrastructure construction fund 3,800
Laboratory services fees 681,600
Land and water permit fees 217,700
Medical waste emergency response fund 32,800
Metallic mining surveillance fee revenue 5,300
Mineral well regulatory fee revenue 10,400
RMH S06106'26 (S-1) n52eu9


Nonferrous metallic mineral surveillance 15,500
NPDES fees 309,400
Oil and gas regulatory fund 449,100
Orphan well fund 16,100
Public swimming pool fund 54,200
Public utility assessments 212,500
Public water supply fees 391,300
Refined petroleum fund 2,824,000
Renew Michigan fund 5,868,100
Sand extraction fee revenue 5,300
Scrap tire regulatory fund 373,300
Septage waste program fund 44,800
Settlement funds 2,000,400
Sewage sludge land application fees 66,500
Soil erosion and sedimentation control training
fund 10,400
Solid waste management fund - staff account 545,800
Stormwater permit fees 159,500
Technologically enhanced naturally occurring
radioactive material 54,800
Underground storage tank cleanup fund 268,200
Wastewater operator training fees 42,100
Water quality protection fund 7,100
Water use reporting fees 21,700
State general fund/general purpose $ 11,151,200
Sec. 103. WATER RESOURCES DIVISION
Full-time equated classified positions 403.0
Aquatic nuisance control program--FTEs 6.0 $ 1,009,600
RMH S06106'26 (S-1) n52eu9


Federal - Great Lakes remedial action plan
grants 583,800
Fish contaminant monitoring 316,100
Great Lakes restoration initiative--FTEs 9.0 11,319,500
Nonpoint source pollution prevention and
control project program 4,083,300
Technology advancements for water monitoring 500,000
Water quality programs--FTEs 223.0 37,069,000
Water quality protection grants 100,000
Water resource programs--FTEs 165.0 28,620,100
Watershed council grants 600,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 84,201,400
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
IDG from state transportation department 2,086,300
Federal revenues:
Federal funds 35,360,900
Special revenue funds:
Aquatic nuisance control fund 1,009,600
Environmental response fund 590,000
Groundwater discharge permit fees 2,276,700
Infrastructure construction fund 52,400
Land and water permit fees 4,399,500
NPDES fees 4,591,600
Refined petroleum fund 456,000
Sewage sludge land application fees 929,700
Soil erosion and sedimentation control training
fund 143,500
RMH S06106'26 (S-1) n52eu9


Stormwater permit fees 2,391,300
Wastewater operator training fees 317,800
Water pollution control revolving fund 152,500
Water quality protection fund 100,000
Water use reporting fees 0
State general fund/general purpose $ 29,343,600
Sec. 104. AIR QUALITY DIVISION
Full-time equated classified positions 225.0
Air quality programs--FTEs 225.0 $ 39,223,600
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 39,223,600
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Federal funds 7,855,500
Special revenue funds:
Air emissions fees 11,417,800
Asbestos inspection fund 2,017,300
Fees and collections 214,300
Oil and gas regulatory fund 148,700
Public utility assessments 150,000
Refined petroleum fund 2,148,800
State general fund/general purpose $ 15,271,200
Sec. 105. REMEDIATION AND REDEVELOPMENT DIVISION
Full-time equated classified positions 329.0
Contaminated site remediation and redevelopment
programs--FTEs 329.0 $ 86,837,700
Emergency cleanup actions 2,000,000
Environmental cleanup and redevelopment program 44,800,000
Superfund cleanup 9,000,000
RMH S06106'26 (S-1) n52eu9


GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 142,637,700
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Federal funds 16,769,200
Special revenue funds:
Cleanup and redevelopment fund 73,076,100
Environmental response fund 1,442,100
Laboratory services fees 14,486,300
Public water supply fees 334,000
Refined petroleum fund 34,135,400
State brownfield redevelopment fund 2,100,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 294,600
Sec. 106. UNDERGROUND STORAGE TANK AUTHORITY
Full-time equated classified positions 12.0
Underground storage tank cleanup program--FTEs 12.0 $ 32,156,600
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 32,156,600
Appropriated from:
Special revenue funds:
Underground storage tank cleanup fund 32,156,600
State general fund/general purpose $ 0
Sec. 107. RENEWING MICHIGAN'S ENVIRONMENT
Full-time equated classified positions 163.0
Information management--FTEs 22.0 $ 6,884,200
Renew Michigan program--FTEs 141.0 70,982,300
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 77,866,500
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
IDG from Michigan department of state police 8,800
RMH S06106'26 (S-1) n52eu9


IDG from state transportation department 13,600
Federal revenues:
Federal funds 5,800
Special revenue funds:
Air emissions fees 93,000
Aquatic nuisance control fund 7,000
Campground fund 2,600
Cleanup and redevelopment fund 244,900
Coal ash care fund 1,900
Electronic waste recycling fund 2,300
Environmental pollution prevention fund 28,900
Fees and collections 1,800
Financial instruments 8,800
Great Lakes protection fund 3,600
Groundwater discharge permit fees 14,900
Infrastructure construction fund 400
Laboratory services fees 55,700
Land and water permit fees 21,200
Medical waste emergency response fund 3,200
Metallic mining surveillance fee revenue 500
Mineral well regulatory fee revenue 1,000
Nonferrous metallic mineral surveillance 1,500
NPDES fees 29,600
Oil and gas regulatory fund 43,300
Orphan well fund 1,500
Public swimming pool fund 5,300
Public utility assessments 18,900
Public water supply fees 37,600
RMH S06106'26 (S-1) n52eu9


Refined petroleum fund 248,100
Renew Michigan fund 71,482,600
Sand extraction fee revenue 500
Scrap tire regulatory fund 36,500
Septage waste program fund 4,300
Sewage sludge land application fees 6,400
Soil erosion and sedimentation control training
fund 1,000
Solid waste management fund - staff account 46,400
Stormwater permit fees 15,500
Technologically enhanced naturally occurring
radioactive material 5,400
Underground storage tank cleanup fund 26,100
Wastewater operator training fees 4,100
Water quality protection fund 700
Water use reporting fees 2,100
State general fund/general purpose $ 5,329,200
Sec. 108. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
Information technology services and projects $ 10,527,400
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 10,527,400
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
IDG from Michigan department of state police 24,800
IDG from state transportation department 38,000
Federal revenues:
Federal funds 2,079,300
Special revenue funds:
Air emissions fees 254,900
RMH S06106'26 (S-1) n52eu9


Aquatic nuisance control fund 19,600
Campground fund 7,500
Cleanup and redevelopment fund 1,319,500
Coal ash care fund 5,200
Electronic waste recycling fund 6,600
Environmental pollution prevention fund 81,600
Fees and collections 4,900
Financial instruments 853,500
Great Lakes protection fund 10,000
Groundwater discharge permit fees 41,700
Infrastructure construction fund 1,000
Laboratory services fees 155,000
Land and water permit fees 59,600
Medical waste emergency response fund 9,000
Metallic mining surveillance fee revenue 1,400
Mineral well regulatory fee revenue 2,800
Nonferrous metallic mineral surveillance 4,200
NPDES fees 83,300
Oil and gas regulatory fund 121,500
Orphan well fund 4,400
Public swimming pool fund 14,700
Public utility assessments 52,800
Public water supply fees 105,600
Refined petroleum fund 891,300
Renew Michigan fund 1,460,200
Sand extraction fee revenue 1,400
Scrap tire regulatory fund 102,000
Septage waste program fund 12,200
RMH S06106'26 (S-1) n52eu9


Sewage sludge land application fees 18,100
Soil erosion and sedimentation control training
fund 2,800
Solid waste management fund - staff account 124,900
Stormwater permit fees 43,700
Technologically enhanced naturally occurring
radioactive material 15,000
Underground storage tank cleanup fund 73,200
Wastewater operator training fees 11,500
Water pollution control revolving fund 33,300
Water quality protection fund 2,000
Water use reporting fees 6,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 2,367,400
Sec. 109. DRINKING WATER AND ENVIRONMENTAL
HEALTH
Full-time equated classified positions 160.0
Drinking water and environmental health--FTEs 160.0 $ 42,393,900
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 42,393,900
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Federal funds 13,804,000
Special revenue funds:
Campground fund 388,800
Fees and collections 34,700
Public swimming pool fund 766,100
Public water supply fees 6,577,000
Refined petroleum fund 765,500
Septage waste program fund 838,500
RMH S06106'26 (S-1) n52eu9


Wastewater operator training fees 275,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 18,944,300
Sec. 110. MATERIALS MANAGEMENT DIVISION
Full-time equated classified positions 133.0
Energy programs-- FTEs 13.0 $ 6,316,300
Material management programs-- FTEs 120.0 29,782,300
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 36,098,600
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
IDG from Michigan department of state police 1,611,700
Federal revenues:
Federal funds 7,390,400
Special revenue funds:
Private funds 652,500
Cleanup and redevelopment fund 3,905,300
Coal ash care fund 268,500
Community pollution prevention fund 1,250,000
Electronic waste recycling fund 337,000
Energy efficiency and renewable energy
revolving loan fund 250,100
Environmental pollution prevention fund 4,237,700
Medical waste emergency response fund 460,800
Public utility assessments 1,815,400
Retired engineers technical assistance program
fund 491,200
Scrap tire regulatory fund 5,668,600
Small business pollution prevention revolving
loan fund 134,400
RMH S06106'26 (S-1) n52eu9


Solid waste management fund - staff account 6,307,500
Technologically enhanced naturally occurring
radioactive material 467,200
State general fund/general purpose $ 850,300
Sec. 111. GEOLOGIC RESOURCES MANAGEMENT DIVISION
Full-time equated classified positions 73.0
Geologic resources management--FTEs 73.0 $ 21,706,200
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 21,706,200
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
IDG from department of licensing and regulatory
affairs 223,800
Federal revenues:
Federal funds 155,200
Infrastructure investment and jobs act fund 5,155,400
Special revenue funds:
Private funds 40,000
Aquifer protection revolving fund 520,000
Metallic mining surveillance fee revenue 92,500
Mineral well regulatory fee revenue 219,200
Native copper mine fund 50,000
Nonferrous metallic mineral surveillance 389,600
Oil and gas regulatory fund 4,002,900
Orphan well fund 2,357,100
Sand extraction fee revenue 91,000
Water use reporting fees 353,200
State general fund/general purpose $ 8,056,300
Sec. 112. WATER INFRASTRUCTURE
RMH S06106'26 (S-1) n52eu9


Full-time equated classified positions 27.0
Municipal assistance--FTEs 27.0 $ 6,804,200
Lead service line replacement 9,601,300
Water state revolving funds 390,000,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 406,405,500
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Federal funds 105,401,100
Infrastructure investment and jobs act fund 270,000,000
Special revenue funds:
Revolving loan revenue bonds 15,000,000
Water pollution control revolving fund 774,300
State general fund/general purpose $ 15,230,100
Sec. 113. ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS
Geothermal energy network revolving loan fund 3,000,000
Local infrastructure preparedness and
protection 2,000,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 5,000,000
Appropriated from:
State general fund/general purpose $ 5,000,000

PART 2
PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS
FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027
GENERAL SECTIONS
Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the
state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September
30, 2027, total state spending under part 1 from state resources is
$474,143,700.00 and state spending under part 1 from state sources
RMH S06106'26 (S-1) n52eu9


to be paid to local units of government is $20,433,300.00. The
following itemized statement identifies appropriations from which
spending to local units of government will occur:
DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENT, GREAT LAKES, AND
ENERGY
Brownfield grants $ 1,000,000
Drinking water and environmental health 8,486,000
Emergency cleanup actions 116,000
Energy programs 460,000
Lead service line replacement 9,601,300
Material management programs 1,270,000
Technology advancements for water monitoring 500,000
TOTAL $ 20,433,300
Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are
subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101
to 18.1594.
Sec. 203. As used in this part and part 1:
(a) "Department" means the department of environment, Great
Lakes, and energy.
(b) "Director" means the director of the department.
(c) "FTE" means full-time equated.
(d) "IDG" means interdepartmental grant.
(e) "NPDES" means the national pollutant discharge elimination
system.
(f) "Standard report recipients" means the senate
appropriations subcommittee on environment, Great Lakes, and
energy; the house appropriations subcommittee on environment, Great
Lakes, and energy; the senate and house fiscal agencies; the senate
and house policy offices; and the state budget office.
RMH S06106'26 (S-1) n52eu9


Sec. 204. The department or agency shall use the internet to
fulfill the reporting requirements of this part and shall make each
report readily accessible to the public and conspicuously post each
required report in a single archivable location on the department's
or agency's Michigan.gov website not later than the due date
required for each report. In addition to placing all reports
required in the current fiscal year on the department's or agency's
website, the department or agency shall maintain on its website all
reports placed on the website from previous fiscal years posted by
fiscal year in the same single archivable location. The department
or agency shall also transmit all required reports for the current
fiscal year to the standard recipients and any other required
recipients by email.
Sec. 205. To the extent permissible under section 261 of the
management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1261, all of the
following apply to the expenditure of funds appropriated in part 1:
(a) The funds must not be used for the purchase of foreign
goods or services, or both, if competitively priced and of
comparable quality American goods or services, or both, are
available.
(b) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both,
manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses, if they are
competitively priced and of comparable quality.
(c) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both,
that are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and
operated by veterans, if they are competitively priced and of
comparable quality.
Sec. 206. The department shall not take disciplinary action
against an employee of the department for communicating with a
RMH S06106'26 (S-1) n52eu9


member of the legislature or legislative staff, unless the
communication is prohibited by law and the department is exercising
its authority as provided by law.
Sec. 207. Consistent with section 217 of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1217, each department and agency
receiving appropriations in part 1 shall prepare a report on out-
of-state travel expenses not later than January 1. The report must
list travel by classified and unclassified employees outside of
this state in the previous fiscal year that was funded in whole or
in part with funds appropriated in the department's or agency's
budget. The department shall submit the report to the standard
report recipients and to the house and senate appropriations
committees. The report must include all of the following
information:
(a) The dates of each travel occurrence.
(b) The total transportation and related expenses of each
travel occurrence and the proportions funded with state general
fund/general purpose revenues, state restricted revenues, federal
revenues, and other revenues.
Sec. 209. Not later than December 15, the state budget office
shall prepare and submit a report that provides estimates of the
total general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses at the
close of the previous fiscal year. The report must summarize the
projected year-end general fund/general purpose appropriation
lapses by major departmental program or program areas. The state
budget office shall submit the report to the standard report
recipients and to the chairpersons of the senate and house
appropriations committees.
Sec. 210. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1,
RMH S06106'26 (S-1) n52eu9


there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $100,000,000.00 for
federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this
subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been
transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of
the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $3,000,000.00 for state
restricted contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under
this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have
been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section
393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(3) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $10,000,000.00 for private
contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this
subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been
transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of
the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
Sec. 211. (1) The department shall cooperate with the
department of technology, management, and budget to maintain a
searchable website accessible by the public at no cost that
includes, but is not limited to, all of the following for the
department:
(a) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by category.
(b) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by appropriation unit.
(c) Fiscal year-to-date payments to a selected vendor,
including the vendor name, payment date, payment amount, and
payment description.
(2) The department shall cooperate with the department of
technology, management, and budget to update the searchable website
RMH S06106'26 (S-1) n52eu9


on a quarterly basis.
Sec. 212. Not later than 14 days after the release of the
executive budget recommendation, the department shall cooperate
with the state budget office to provide an annual report on
estimated state restricted fund balances, state restricted fund
projected revenues, and state restricted fund expenditures for the
previous 2 fiscal years. The report must be submitted to the
standard report recipients and to the chairpersons of the senate
and house appropriations committees.
Sec. 214. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to
restrict or impede a marginalized community's access to government
resources, programs, or facilities.
(2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, local governments
shall report any action or policy that attempts to restrict or
interfere with the duties of a local health officer.
Sec. 215. To the extent permissible under the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594, the director of
each department or agency receiving appropriations in part 1 shall
take all reasonable steps to ensure geographically-disadvantaged
business enterprises compete for and perform contracts to provide
services or supplies, or both. The director shall strongly
encourage firms with which the department contracts to subcontract
with certified geographically-disadvantaged business enterprises
for services, supplies, or both. As used in this section,
"geographically-disadvantaged business enterprises" means that term
as defined in Executive Directive 2023-1.
Sec. 216. On a quarterly basis, the department or agency
receiving appropriations in part 1 shall report on the number of
full-time equated positions in pay status by civil service
RMH S06106'26 (S-1) n52eu9


classification, including a comparison by line item of the number
of full-time equated positions authorized from funds appropriated
in part 1 to the actual number of full-time equated positions
employed by the department at the end of the reporting period. The
report must be submitted to the senate and house appropriations
committees and to the standard report recipients.
Sec. 217. (1) The department shall maximize utilization of its
in-person state workforce. The department shall prioritize
occupancy utilization of office space for each division within the
department. Employees with job responsibilities that require the
employees to serve in their capacities outside of an office shall
be monitored each pay period to ensure all work hours reported on
the timesheet were actually worked.
(2) The department shall comply with requirements set by the
office of state employer to meet the in-person and vacancy rate
objectives outlined by the office of state employer.
(3) The department shall adhere to the rules and regulations
of civil service, which state that the standard biweekly work
period for a full-time employee in the classified service is the
equivalent of 80 hours of work. The department shall establish
policies and processes to ensure all employees are working their
jobs during agreed-upon business hours.
Sec. 219. The department shall receive and retain copies of
all reports funded from appropriations in part 1. The department
shall follow federal and state guidelines for short-term and long-
term retention of records. The department may electronically retain
copies of reports unless otherwise required by federal and state
law and guidelines.
Sec. 220. Not later than April 1, the department shall report
RMH S06106'26 (S-1) n52eu9


on each specific policy change made to implement a public act
affecting the department that took effect during the previous
calendar year. The report must include reference to the public act
that necessitates the policy change. The department shall submit
the report to the standard report recipients, to the senate and
house appropriations committees, and to the joint committee on
administrative rules.
Sec. 221. If the state administrative board, acting under
section 3 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.3, transfers funds from an amount
appropriated under part 1, the legislature may, by a concurrent
resolution adopted by a majority of the members elected to and
serving in each house, inter-transfer funds within part 1 for the
particular department, board, commission, officer, or institution.
Sec. 222. To the extent possible, the department shall not
expend appropriations in part 1 until all existing authorized work
project funds available for the same purposes are exhausted.
Sec. 223. The state budget director shall take steps to ensure
that all state fiscal recovery funds allocated to this state under
the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, are
expended by December 31, 2026, as required by law. Any state fiscal
recovery funds that would otherwise lapse after September 30, 2026,
are automatically reappropriated for the same purpose as originally
authorized and available for expenditure through December 31, 2026,
and any subsequent financial close-out period.
Sec. 224. (1) The state budget director shall take steps to
ensure that all state fiscal recovery funds allocated to this state
under the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, are
expended by December 31, 2026, as required by law. The state budget
director may reallocate appropriated funds for the purpose of fully
RMH S06106'26 (S-1) n52eu9


utilizing state fiscal recovery funds that are in jeopardy of not
meeting the expenditure deadline for reasons that may include, but
are not limited to, completed projects coming in under budget or
funds unable to be fully used by subrecipients. The state budget
director shall reallocate any of the funds reallocated under this
subsection to the programs or purposes specified in this section.
Any funds reallocated are unappropriated and immediately
reappropriated for the following purposes:
(a) To reclassify general fund/general purpose appropriations
for payroll and covered benefits for eligible public health and
safety employees at the department of corrections.
(b) To reclassify general fund/general purpose appropriations
for payroll and covered benefits for eligible public health and
safety employees at the department of state police.
(2) All applicable guidance, implementation, and reporting
provisions of the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-
2, must be followed for state fiscal recovery funds reallocated and
reappropriated under subsection (1).
(3) The state budget director shall notify the senate and
house appropriations committees not later than 1 business day after
making any reallocations under subsection (1). The notification
must include the authorized program under which funds were
originally appropriated, the amount of the reallocation, the
program, or programs, or purpose, and the department to which the
funds are being reallocated under subsection (1), and the amount
reallocated to each program or purpose.
Sec. 225. The department must provide an annual report to the
standard report recipients detailing significant federal policy
changes that do, or are expected to significantly impact the
RMH S06106'26 (S-1) n52eu9


operations of the department, including reductions in federal
revenue or changes that are likely to lead to a reduction in the
department's ability to safeguard the health or welfare of the
public.
Sec. 226. (1) Not later than 30 days after the effective date
of this act, the house and senate shall provide to the state budget
office a jointly agreed-upon list of legislatively directed
spending items funded in part 1 as defined in 2025 PA 32 and 2025
PA 33. The list must include all information and documents
pertaining to the funded items as publicly disclosed in accordance
with 2025 PA 32 and 2025 PA 33.
(2) In accordance with section 364(4) of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364, the department or agency
administering the grant shall post a report in a publicly
accessible location on its website beginning March 15 of the
current fiscal year. The department or agency shall update the
report and post an updated report not later than June 15 of the
current fiscal year and again not later than September 15 of the
current fiscal year. The department shall include in the report the
most comprehensive information the department has available at the
time of posting for grants awarded.
Sec. 228. (1) The department may expend amounts remaining from
the current and prior fiscal year appropriations to meet funding
needs of the environmental cleanup and redevelopment program,
environmental cleanup support, contaminated site remediation and
redevelopment programs, contaminated site cleanup, contaminated
site cleanup contingency reserve, premcor remediation activities,
PFAS remediation grant program, the renew Michigan program, the
refined petroleum product cleanup program, brownfield grants and
RMH S06106'26 (S-1) n52eu9


loans, waterfront grants, and the environmental bond site
reclamation program.
(2) Unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining from
appropriations from the clean Michigan initiative fund - response
activities contained in 2011 PA 63, 2013 PA 59, 2014 PA 252, 2015
PA 84, 2016 PA 268, 2017 PA 107, and 2025 PA 22 are appropriated
for expenditure.
(3) Unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining from
appropriations from the refined petroleum fund activities contained
in 2013 PA 59, 2014 PA 252, 2015 PA 84, 2016 PA 268, 2017 PA 107,
2018 PA 207, 2019 PA 57, 2020 PA 166, 2021 PA 87, 2022 PA 166, 2023
PA 119, 2024 PA 121, and 2025 PA 22 are appropriated for
expenditure.
(4) Unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining from the
appropriations from the strategic water quality initiatives fund
contained in 2011 PA 50, 2011 PA 63, 2012 PA 200, 2013 PA 59, 2014
PA 252, 2015 PA 84, 2016 PA 268, 2017 PA 107, and 2018 PA 207, are
appropriated for expenditure.
(5) For the strategic water quality initiatives fund, funds
not yet disbursed are appropriated for expenditure for the same
program under sections 5201, 5202, and 5204e of the natural
resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL
324.5201, 324.5202, and 324.5204e.
(6) Unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining from the
appropriations from the renew Michigan fund contained in 2018 PA
207, 2019 PA 57, 2020 PA 166, 2021 PA 87, 2022 PA 166, 2023 PA 119,
2024 PA 121, and 2025 PA 22 are appropriated for expenditure.
(7) Unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining from the
appropriations from the contaminated site cleanup contingency fund
RMH S06106'26 (S-1) n52eu9


contained in 2021 PA 87 and 2022 PA 166, are appropriated for
expenditure.
(8) Unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining from the
appropriations from the cleanup and redevelopment fund contained in
2022 PA 166, 2023 PA 119, 2024 PA 121, and 2025 PA 22 are
appropriated for expenditure.
Sec. 229. Revenues that remain in the settlements fund at the
end of the fiscal year carry forward into the succeeding fiscal
year.
Sec. 230. (1) In addition to any other requirements under this
part, if the department is authorized under this part to expend
funds in addition to those appropriated in part 1, the department
must do all of the following:
(a) Not later than November 1, provide a report to the
chairpersons of the house and senate appropriations committees, the
house and senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget office that
details all of the following:
(i) The type of funding received during the previous fiscal
year that was authorized in part 2 of the article that made
appropriations for the department in the previous fiscal year.
(ii) When the funding was received.
(iii) The amount of funding received.
(iv) How much of the funding was spent and for what purpose or
purposes.
(b) Not later than 60 days after receipt of funds authorized
under this part, provide a report to the chairpersons of the house
and senate appropriations committees, the house and senate fiscal
agencies, and the state budget office that details all of the
following:
RMH S06106'26 (S-1) n52eu9


(i) The type of funding received.
(ii) When the funding was received.
(iii) The amount of funding received.
(iv) The anticipated or actual amount to be spent and the
specified purpose or purposes.
(c) Not later than February 15, provide a report to the
chairpersons of the house and senate appropriations committees, the
house and senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget office with
an estimate of funding authorized by this part that the department
anticipates it will receive in the subsequent fiscal year,
identifying all of the following:
(i) The type or types of funding anticipated.
(ii) The amount or amounts of funding anticipated.
(iii) The purpose or purposes of the funding.
(2) If another reporting requirement under this part would
provide substantially similar information on a substantially
similar time frame as would be reported under subsection (1),
subsection (1) does not apply.
Sec. 235. (1) Semiannually, the department shall prepare a
report that contains information regarding all remediation and
redevelopment efforts funded from part 1.
(2) The report must contain the following information:
(a) List of sites where work is planned to occur, including
the county for each site.
(b) The type of site, whether refined petroleum cleanup,
nonrefined petroleum cleanup, brownfield, or a combination of
types.
(c) A brief description of how the issue will be addressed,
including whether contractors will be utilized.
RMH S06106'26 (S-1) n52eu9


(d) The estimated date for project completion.
(e) The amount and funding source or sources allocated to the
site.
(3) The report must be submitted to the senate and house
subcommittees on the environment, Great Lakes, and energy and the
state budget director.
Sec. 238. The department shall submit a report to the senate
and house standing committees and appropriations subcommittees with
primary responsibility for issues under the jurisdiction of the
department that details departmental activities of the most recent
fiscal year in administering permitting programs. The report must
include, at a minimum, all of the following:
(a) The number of FTEs assigned to each permitting program and
the number of unfilled positions at the beginning and end of the
most recent fiscal year.
(b) The number of permit applications received by the
department in the preceding year, including applications for new
and increased uses and reissuances.
(c) The number of permits for each program approved.
(d) The number of permits for each program denied.
(e) The percentage and number of permit applications that were
reviewed for administrative completeness within statutory time
frames.
(f) The percentage and number of permit applications for which
a final action was taken by the department within statutory time
frames for new and increased uses and reissuances.
(g) Activities to reduce any backlog of permits that exceed
the statutory time frames and the average time frame for permit
approvals for each program.
RMH S06106'26 (S-1) n52eu9


(h) Activities to reduce the percentage of permit applications
submitted as incomplete, in need of modification, or additional
information before final determination.
(i) Under conditions in which the department states a permit
is incomplete or denied, the department shall provide an
explanation as to the reason or reasons the permit is insufficient
and how the permit can be strengthened or made complete.
Sec. 239. Not later than April 1, the department shall provide
to the standard report recipients a copy of its annual strategic
plan prepared in compliance with section 363 of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1363. The plan must include the
mission, vision, goals, strategies, and performance measures of the
department.
Sec. 240. The department shall report on any court settlement
that may require further legislative review of state statutory
programs or regulations.
Sec. 242. If the department responds to a significant incident
to protect life or property, as soon as possible and within 24
hours after the department responds to the significant incident,
the department shall notify, in writing, the senate and house
members whose district includes the site.
Sec. 246. Not later than 6 months after the state budget
office issues work project letters, the department shall submit an
annual report that summarizes all work project accounts. The report
must include all of the following:
(a) A list of all work project accounts.
(b) The status of all work project accounts, including amounts
expended, amounts encumbered, and available balances for each
account.
RMH S06106'26 (S-1) n52eu9


(c) The amount of funds that lapsed from any previously
designated work project accounts, the name and description of the
work project account, and the funds that received the lapsed
amounts.
Sec. 247. Total authorized appropriations from all sources
under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September
30, 2027 are estimated at $19,364,100.00. From this amount, total
appropriations for pension-related legacy costs for the department
are estimated at $19,364,100.00. Total appropriations for retiree
health care legacy costs for the department are estimated at $0.00.
Sec. 248. Revenues remaining in the asbestos inspection fund
created in section 5519a of the natural resources and environmental
protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.5519a, at the end of the
fiscal year carry forward into the succeeding fiscal year.

REMEDIATION AND REDEVELOPMENT DIVISION
Sec. 301. Revenues remaining in the laboratory services fees
fund at the end of the fiscal year carry forward into the
succeeding fiscal year.
Sec. 302. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for
contaminated site remediation and redevelopment programs, emergency
cleanup actions, and environmental cleanup and redevelopment
program are designated as work project appropriations, and any
unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the
fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for projects
under this section until the projects have been completed. The
following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a:
(a) The purpose of the projects is to provide contaminated
RMH S06106'26 (S-1) n52eu9


site cleanup.
(b) The projects will be accomplished by utilizing contracts
with service providers.
(c) The total estimated cost of all projects is identified in
each line-item appropriation.
(d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2031.
Sec. 304. (1) In addition to the money appropriated in part 1,
the department may receive and expend money from the subaccounts of
the cleanup and redevelopment fund as described under section 20108
of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA
451, MCL 324.20108, including the environmental response fund or
the natural resource damages fund, to provide funding for actions
by the department that are authorized by a court of competent
jurisdiction and set forth in a final court order or judgment in an
action to which the department is a party.
(2) Not later than January 30, the department shall submit a
report to the appropriations subcommittees, the fiscal agencies,
and the state budget office that provides a summary of the
expenditures incurred under this section during the preceding
fiscal year.

WATER RESOURCES DIVISION
Sec. 405. If a certified health department does not exist in a
city, county, or district or does not fulfill its responsibilities
under part 117 of the natural resources and environmental
protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.11701 to 324.11721, the
department may spend funds appropriated in part 1 for drinking
water and environmental health in accordance with section 11716 of
the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA
RMH S06106'26 (S-1) n52eu9


451, MCL 324.11716.
Sec. 410. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall compile a report by November 1 of every fiscal
year ending in an odd number on the status of the implementation
plan for the western Lake Erie basin collaborative agreement. In an
effort to learn more about the presence and timing of harmful algal
blooms, the report must contain all of the following:
(a) An estimated cost of removal of total phosphorus per pound
at the 4 major wastewater treatment plants.
(b) A description of the grants that have been awarded.
(c) A description of the work that has commenced on the issue
of dissolved reactive phosphorus, the expected objectives and
outcomes of that work, and a list of the parties involved in that
effort.
(d) A description of the efforts and outcomes aimed at the
total phosphorus reduction for the River Raisin watershed.

UNDERGROUND STORAGE TANK AUTHORITY
Sec. 701. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for the
underground storage tank cleanup program are designated as a work
project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds
shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be
available for expenditures for projects under this section until
the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance
with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431,
MCL 18.1451a:
(a) The purpose of the project is to provide underground
storage tank cleanup.
(b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing contracts
RMH S06106'26 (S-1) n52eu9


with service providers.
(c) The total estimated cost of the project is $20,000,000.00.
(d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2031.

RENEWING MICHIGAN'S ENVIRONMENT
Sec. 801. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for the
renewing Michigan's environment program are designated as a work
project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds
shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be
available for expenditures for projects under this section until
the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance
with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431,
MCL 18.1451a:
(a) The purpose of the project is for environmental cleanup
and redevelopment, waste management, and recycling.
(b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state
employees or contracts with service providers, or both.
(c) The total estimated cost of the project is $70,495,800.00.
(d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2031.

MATERIALS MANAGEMENT DIVISION
Sec. 901. In addition to the money appropriated in part 1, the
department may receive and expend money from the Volkswagen
Environmental Mitigation Trust Agreement to provide funding for
activities as outlined within the State's Mitigation Plan. The
department shall prepare a report to the appropriations
subcommittees, the fiscal agencies, and the state budget office by
February 1, 2027 of the expenditures incurred under this section
during the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026.
RMH S06106'26 (S-1) n52eu9



WATER INFRASTRUCTURE
Sec. 951. The funds appropriated in part 1 for lead service
line replacement must be used to support water infrastructure
projects, including, but not limited to, lead service line
replacement and associated activities, drinking water projects,
wastewater management, or stormwater management to promote
coordinated water infrastructure work.

ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 1001. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for geothermal
energy network revolving loan fund must be allocated for the
creation and administration of a geothermal energy network
revolving loan fund to provide upfront financing for networked
geothermal energy projects undertaken by local units of government
and public institutions.
(2) The program must prioritize projects within low-income or
disadvantaged communities.
(3) No more than 10% of the funds allocated under this section
may be expended for program administration and related costs.
(4) The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for geothermal
energy network revolving loan fund are designated as work project
appropriations, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not
lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for
expenditures for projects under this section until the projects
have been completed. The following is in compliance with section
451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a:
(a) The purpose of the projects is to provide low-interest
loans for developing networked geothermal projects.
RMH S06106'26 (S-1) n52eu9


(b) The projects will be accomplished by utilizing contracts
with service providers.
(c) The total estimated cost of all projects is $3,000,000.00.
(d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2031.
Final Page
RMH S06106'26 (S-1) n52eu9